Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LOCAL ROAD IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $250,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, for: new text end new text begin (1) eligible improvements on trunk highway corridor projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.52, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) construction and reconstruction of local roads with statewide or regional significance under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.52, subdivision 4; or new text end new text begin (3) grants to counties to assist in paying the costs of rural road safety capital improvement projects on county state-aid highways under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.52, subdivision 4a. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin LOCAL BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $150,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation to rehabilitate, construct, or reconstruct bridges as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin BOND AUTHORIZATION.new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in sections 1 and 2 from the bond proceeds account, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $400,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. new text end